District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0439.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this act may
be cited as the “Enforcing Yield-to-Pedestrian and Truck Restricted Routes Amendment
Act of 2025”.
Sec. 2. Section 103(b) of the Safety-Based Traffic Enforcement Amendment Act of 2012
(D.C. Law 19-307; D.C. Official Code § 50–2209.11), effective May 1, 2021, is amended
by adding a new subparagraph (1)(C) to read as follows:
“(C) By January 1, 2026, the Mayor shall have operating at least:
“(1) 30 truck restricted route automated enforcement cameras, 15 of which shall
be located in the Ward with the highest concentration of land zoned for production, distribution,
and repair; and
“(2) 15 failure-to-yield-to-pedestrian automated enforcement cameras.”
Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,

approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 4. Effective date.
This act shall take effect after approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), a 30-day period of congressional review as
provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)), and publication in the District of
Columbia Register.